California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(2) Establishing inspection fees applicable to processors not subject to county inspection fees.

(3) Establishing inspection and reporting requirements for enforcement of salad product standards by the commissioners and the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 734, Sec. 17.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

42796.

(a) This section applies to lots of fruits, nuts, and vegetables imported into California which have not been sold, offered for sale, distributed in this state, or have not otherwise entered commercial distribution channels in this state.

(b) When the director or a commissioner finds a lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables which fails to comply with this division, or regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and the person in possession requests permission to hold the lot for shipment out of state, the director or commissioner may, by permit, authorize the lot to be so held and transported, in full or as partial lots. The director or commissioner may charge a fee to cover any costs incurred for the permit and related inspections to determine compliance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 996, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Standardization Program [42801. - 42813.]

42801.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the director shall create an industry-funded standardization program for the purposes of implementing and enforcing this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42802.

The director shall adopt regulations he or she determines are reasonably necessary to carry out this article, including, but not limited to, establishing assessment rates and procedures for payment of assessments. The director shall consult with the committee created pursuant to Section 42809 prior to the adoption, amendment, or repeal of any regulations under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42803.

(a) Commencing on January 1, 1997, and until March 31, 1997, producers of commodities subject to this article may file a petition with the secretary requesting that the commodity be exempted from this article.

(b) Upon a finding by the secretary that the petition represents not less than 51 percent of the producers of the commodity who produce not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity marketed in the preceding marketing season, the secretary shall do all of the following:

(1) Declare the commodity exempt from this article.

(2) Immediately repeal all regulations pertaining to the commodity adopted by the secretary pursuant to this division.

(3) Make a determination concerning a refund of any assessments collected pursuant to this article.

(c) Commodity exemptions granted pursuant to this section shall be effective immediately on the date of the finding specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 241, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42804.

(a) On and after March 31, 1997, the secretary shall exempt any commodity subject to this article and repeal all regulations pertaining to the commodity adopted by the secretary pursuant to this division if:

(1) A written petition requesting exemption is filed with the secretary during the period commencing July 1 and ending December 31 of any year.

(2) The secretary finds that the petition represents not less than 51 percent of the producers directly affected who have produced not less than 51 percent of the total quantity of the commodity marketed in the preceding marketing season.

(3) The petition, prior to being submitted to the secretary, was circulated among the producers directly affected for a period not exceeding 90 days and was on a form approved by the secretary.

(b) Exemptions granted under this section shall be effective on July 1 following the year in which the petition is filed with the secretary.

(c) Any costs incurred by the department in processing any petition for exemption filed pursuant to this section shall be borne by the producers representing the commodity for which the petition is filed.

(d) This section also applies to producers of any commodity who request the secretary to rescind a previously granted exemption.

(e) All producers directly affected by this section shall provide the following information to the secretary upon filing of the written petition requesting exemption:

(1) The correct name and address of each producer or handler.

(2) The quantity of each commodity produced by the producer during the previous marketing season.

(f) The secretary also may require handlers of commodities subject to this article to report quantities received from each producer in the previous season.

(g) Any determination of compliance with this section may be based upon information provided by producers or handlers of commodities subject to this article. Failure or refusal to provide that information within the specified time does not invalidate the secretary’s findings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 241, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.

A commodity producer or handler subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 44971) of Chapter 9, or any other similar provision in this division that provides for collection of assessments and reimbursement to the director for inspection and certification activities related to the commodity may seek an exemption for that commodity pursuant to Section 42803 or 42804 and remain subject to all regulations pertaining to the commodity in effect at the time the petition for exemption is filed with the director, and thereafter until the regulations are amended or repealed.

Any producers of commodities who elect to request an exemption pursuant to this section shall pay any charges mutually agreed upon by the producer and the department for administrative services relating to the regulation of the commodity, including, but not limited to, the adoption, amendment, or repeal of regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42806.

(a) The director shall adopt regulations establishing assessment rates set by the committee established pursuant to Section 42809. The committee shall set the rates on or before March 1. The rates shall become effective the following July 1.

(b) The establishment, alteration, rescission, or elimination of assessment rates or the repeal of regulations of exempt commodities pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. An order to repeal the regulations of exempt commodities pursuant to this section shall be transmitted within 30 days by the director to the Office of Administrative Law. The Office of Administrative Law shall file the order promptly with the Secretary of State without further review pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of Chapter 3.5 of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The order shall do all of the following:

(1) Indicate that the regulations are being repealed pursuant to this article.

(2) State that the order is being transmitted for filing.

(3) Request that the Office of Administrative Law publish a notice of the filing of the order and print an appropriate reference in Title 3 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) All assessments collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund and shall be used only for implementing and enforcing this division.

(d) Those commodities that are otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee shall pay a lower rate of assessment than those commodities that are not otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee.

(e) Assessment rates for commodities that are not otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee shall not exceed six mills ($0.006) per container.

(f) Assessment rates for commodities that are otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee shall not exceed three mills ($0.003) per container.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42807.

Notwithstanding Section 42806, on January 1, 1997, and thereafter until altered, rescinded, or eliminated, the assessment rate for those commodities that are not otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee shall be three mills ($0.003) per container and the assessment rate for those commodities that are otherwise subject to a mandatory inspection fee shall be one mill ($0.001) per container.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42808.

(a) Every person acting as a handler of commodities subject to this division shall do all of the following:

(1) Register with the director and submit reports and assessments required pursuant to this article and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(2) Keep a complete and accurate record of commodities shipped by him or her. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as prescribed by the director.

(3) Maintain records for a period of two years that shall be offered and submitted for inspection and audit at any reasonable time upon written demand of the director.

(b) Every person acting as a handler of commodities subject to this division, shall be personally liable for the payment of assessments. Any handler who fails to file the required reports or pay any assessment or inspection fee by the last day of the month immediately following the month in which the commodities were shipped shall pay to the director a penalty of 10 percent of the assessment or fee determined to be due, and in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(c) Handlers shall maintain and file the records required pursuant to this article even if no assessments are due for a reporting period.

(d) Any person that violates this article or the regulations adopted thereunder may be prosecuted criminally pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 42971), and, in addition, shall be subject to the civil penalties and remedies set forth in Article 13 (commencing with Section 43001).

(e) For the purposes of this article, “handler” means any person engaged in marketing commodities subject to this article that the person has purchased or acquired from a producer and who first prepares the commodities for market on behalf of the producer, whether as owner, agent, broker, processor, or otherwise. A producer engaged in marketing commodities subject to this article directly to a person who purchases the commodity solely for retail sale is deemed to be the handler and is subject to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42809.

(a) The secretary shall appoint a committee pursuant to subdivision (b) to provide recommendations and advice on all matters pertaining to the implementation and enforcement of this division.

(b) The committee shall be composed of 13 voting members who have a financial interest, either personal or through their employment, in a commodity represented. The secretary shall appoint the members of the committee from a list of nominees provided by the commodity groups subject to this article, as follows:

(1) Four members shall be appointed from the fresh fruit commodity group consisting of oranges, other citrus fruits, strawberries, and table grapes.

(2) Two members shall be appointed to represent other fresh fruit commodities.

(3) Four members shall be appointed from the fresh vegetable commodity group consisting of broccoli, tomatoes, and lettuce.

(4) Two members shall be appointed to represent other vegetable commodity groups.

(5) One member shall be appointed from other commodity groups subject to this article.

(6) A county agricultural commissioner may be appointed by the secretary as a nonvoting member.

(c) The committee shall meet at the request of the secretary, the committee chairperson, or upon the request of four committee members.

(d) Any committee member who represents a commodity that has been exempted from the application of this article shall be replaced with a member chosen to maintain the balance between the commodity groups.

(e) The committee shall appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and any other officers it deems necessary.

(f) Committee members may participate in meetings of the committee by means of telephone conference calls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 241, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

42810.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the term of office of any member of the committee shall be two years.

(b) With respect to the initial voting members of the committee, six members shall serve for one year and six members shall serve for two years, with the determinations of the term of each voting member to be made by lot. No member of the committee shall serve more than four full consecutive two-year terms. The term of the initial nonvoting member shall be two years.

(c) Any vacancy which occurs during an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired term following the same procedures for initially nominating and appointing committee members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42811.

The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as determined by the committee and approved by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42812.

The director shall adopt regulations establishing assessment rates set by the committee as required by Section 42806. In addition, the director shall seek the advice of the committee on all matters pertaining to the implementation and enforcement of this division, including, but not limited to, the annual budget, fees necessary to provide adequate inspection services, inspection procedures, work load standards, performance measures, training and supervision of inspectors, enforcement actions, and subvention of funds to counties necessary to provide uniformity in inspections throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42813.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 42807 with respect to assessments, in adopting, amending, or repealing regulations pursuant to this article, the director shall accept the recommendations of the committee if the director determines that the recommendations are practicable and in the interests of the industry and the public. The director shall, within 30 days, provide the committee with a written statement of reasons if the director does not accept a recommendation of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective June 3, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Powers of Enforcing Officers [42821. - 42825.]

42821.

An enforcing officer may enter and inspect any place or conveyance within the county or district over which he has jurisdiction, where any fresh or dried fruits, nuts, or vegetables are produced, stored, packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, being transported, or sold.

He may inspect all fresh or dried fruits, nuts, and vegetables and their containers and equipment found in any such place or conveyance. He may also take for inspection, such representative samples of the produce and such containers, as may be necessary to determine whether or not this division has been violated and may subject such samples of produce to any method of inspection or testing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42822.

An enforcing officer shall cause the prosecution of any person whom he knows or has reason to believe is guilty of violating any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42823.

Any enforcing officer may, while enforcing this division, seize and hold as evidence all or any part of any pack, load, bulk lot, consignment or shipment of fresh or dried fruits, nuts, or vegetables which is packed, delivered for shipment, loaded, shipped, or being transported, or sold in violation of this division, or any container of such product, as may in his judgment be necessary to secure the conviction of the party he knows or believes has violated or is violating any provision of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42824.

Any prosecution for the violation of any provision of this division may be made in any county where any part of the offense occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42825.

Any evidence which is taken by an enforcing officer in any county may be admitted in evidence in any prosecution in any other county.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Samples [42851. - 42852.]

42851.

Any sample which is taken pursuant to this division is prima facie evidence of the true conditions of the entire lot in the examination of which the sample was taken. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262.)
-------------------------------------------

42852.

A written notice of violation, which is issued by a duly qualified representative of the director or by any commissioner or any qualified representative of the commissioner, which states that a certain lot of produce violates any provision of this division and based upon the examination of such sample, is prima facie evidence of the true condition of the entire lot. The presumption established by this section is a presumption affecting the burden of proof, but it does not apply in a criminal action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 262, Sec. 27.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Warning Notices and Disposal Orders [42881. - 42886.]

42881.

The enforcing officer may, and if requested by an enforcing officer of the county of destination shall, affix a warning notice to any vehicle or other means of transportation, or to any load or lot, of fruits, nuts, or vegetables which do not conform to the standards which are established by this division, whether or not the fruits, nuts, or vegetables are exempt from such standards, and serve a disposal order upon the owner or person that has custody or possession of any such load or lot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42882.

The warning notice, the disposal order which directs the proper disposition of such products, and the disposal order receipt to be signed by an enforcing officer at destination which confirms such disposition, shall be in the form which is specified by, and provided by, the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42883.

The enforcing officer at the point of destination of such load or lot shall determine that the load or lot has been delivered to the consignee at the destination which is specified in the order and shall then release the load or lot and contersign the disposal order receipt so given to him. He shall immediately forward the receipt to the enforcing officer who served the disposal order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42884.

It is unlawful for any person to deliver any load or lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables which is subject to a disposal order to any person or destination except the person or destination which is shown on the disposal order, unless he is specifically authorized in writing to do so by an enforcing officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42885.

It is unlawful for any person to dispose of any load or lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables which is subject to a disposal order prior to the release in writing of the load or lot by the enforcing officer at the point of destination. This section does not, however, make it unlawful for any person to unload and store any load or lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables which is subject to a disposal order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42886.

It is unlawful for any person to use or dispose of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables, for which a disposal order has been issued, in any manner or for any purpose except the manner or purpose for which such disposal order was issued, unless such person is specifically authorized in writing to do so by an enforcing officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Shippers and Transporters [42911. - 42912.]

42911.

Any person, forwarding company, or common carrier may decline to ship or transport any fruits, nuts, or vegetables if it is notified by any enforcing officer of this division, that such products are found to be delivered for shipment in violation of this division.

Any such person, forwarding company, or common carrier may reserve the right, in any receipt, bill of lading, or other writing which is given to the consignor, to reject for shipment and to return to the consignor or hold at the expense and risk of the consignor all fruits, nuts, or vegetables, which upon inspection are found to be delivered for shipment in violation of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42912.

A carrier which is subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission that transports any fruits, nuts, or vegetables in the ordinary course of its business as a carrier shall not be deemed to be in violation of any provision of this division, unless such carrier shall willfully fail or refuse to stop the transportation of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables with reasonable dispatch after being notified in writing by any enforcing officer of this division that such products are found to be delivered for shipment in violation of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Violations [42941. - 42951.]

42941.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, deliver for sale, load, ship, transport, cause to be transported, or sell any fruits, nuts, or vegetables in bulk, or in any container or subcontainer, unless such fruits, nuts, and vegetables, and their containers, conform to the provisions of this division or the regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1470.)
-------------------------------------------

42942.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, load, ship, transport, or sell a deceptive pack, bulk lot, bulk load, load, arrangement, or display of fresh or dried fruits, nuts, or vegetables.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42943.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to mislabel any fruit, nut, or vegetable, or place or have any false or misleading statement or designation of quality, grade, trademark, or trade name, on any wrapper or container, or on the label or lining of any container of any fresh or dried fruit, nut, or vegetable, or on any placard which is used in connection with, or which has reference to, any fresh or dried fruit, nut, or vegetable or container, bulk lot, bulk load, load, arrangement, or display of fresh or dried fruits, nuts, or vegetables.

(b) This section requires the obliteration of incorrect or unauthorized labels or markings prior to commercial reuse of containers. The use of empty containers solely as a platform for retail display of other properly labeled containers containing the commodity for sale, or the use of containers for purposes not involving the sale of the product therein, does not constitute “commercial reuse” for these purposes.

(c) This section does not require the obliteration of old markings or labels by a grower employing a used container solely to transport, and not for display or sale, that grower’s own agricultural products to or from, or both to and from, a certified farmers’ market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

42944.

It is unlawful for any person to make any statement, representation, or assertion orally, by public outcry, or proclamation, or in writing, or by any other manner or means whatever, which concerns the quality, size, maturity, condition of, or any other matter which relates to fruits, nuts, or vegetables, which is false, deceptive, or misleading in any particular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42945.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to remove or dispose of any fruits, nuts, or vegetables, or their containers to which any warning tag or notice has been affixed, or to remove the warning tag or notice from the place where it is affixed, except under a written permit to do so from an enforcing officer or under his or her specific direction.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

42946.

Except as otherwise provided, it is unlawful for any person to pack any fruits, nuts, or vegetables in layers in any container which has straight sides, unless there is approximately the same numerical count in each layer.

All packed fruits, nuts, or vegetables shall be so packed that they will not move in the container. Fruits or vegetables which, after having been in storage or after having been shipped, fail to meet this requirement due to unavoidable natural shrinkage which occurs after packing, do not violate this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42947.

It is unlawful for any person to pack any mixture of fresh or dried fruits, with or without nuts, glazed fruits, or confections, unless the contents of the lower layers or unexposed portion are of the same kind and quality, and in the same proportion, as to count, volume, and weight, as the contents of the top layer or the exposed portions.

A consumer type package, also known as “gift pack,” need not, however, comply with such requirement if it complies with all of the following requirements: 

(a) The package is sold in its unbroken form and is clearly and conspicuously marked “consumer package” or “gift pack”.

(b) The package is clearly and conspicuously marked to indicate the contents of the unexposed portion.

(c) The contents of the lower layers or the unexposed portion are of the same size and quality as the top layer or the exposed portion.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42948.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to refuse to submit any container, subcontainer, load, or display of fruits, nuts, or vegetables to the inspection of any enforcing officer, or to refuse to stop any vehicle which contains any fruits, nuts, or vegetables, for the purpose of inspection by an enforcing officer.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

42949.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to alter in any respect any certificate of inspection, notice of violation, report, statement, or other document that is referred to in this division, which is issued by an enforcing officer.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than three thousand dollars ($3,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1068, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

42950.

It is unlawful for any person to prepare, pack, place, deliver for shipment, deliver for sale, load, ship, transport, or sell any nuts, fresh fruits, or vegetables in bulk, or in any container or subcontainer, unless 90 percent by weight or more of such fruits, nuts, or vegetables in bulk, or in any container or subcontainer, as established by the inspection of a representative sample, are free from insect injury which has penetrated or damaged the edible portion, worms, mold, or decay.

This section applies only to those fruits, nuts, or vegetables for which specific quality standards are not otherwise established in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

42951.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to adulterate any solution or chemical or to alter any instrument or any other device provided to an enforcing officer for use in determining compliance with this division or the regulations adopted pursuant to this division.

(b) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or more than three thousand dollars ($3,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1048, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Criminal Penalties and Procedures [42971. - 42971.]

42971.

(a) Unless otherwise specified, a violation of this division is an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). 

(b) A conviction of a second or subsequent violation of this division is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1048, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Civil Penalties and Remedies [43001. - 43004.]

43001.

Any person that violates any provision of this division shall, in addition to any penalty which is otherwise provided, be liable civilly, in an action brought by the director, for a penalty in an amount which is equal to the value which the fruits, nuts, or vegetables involved in the violation would have if they conformed to the requirements of this division.

The value of such noncomplying fruits, nuts, and vegetables shall be the current market value of the lowest priced grade of a marketable commodity of like kind and nature at the time and place of the violation. Any money which is recovered under this section shall be paid into the Department of Agriculture Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43002.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the second or other repeated violation, or threatened second or other repeated violation, of any provision of this division in the superior court in and for the county in which the violation occurred or is about to occur.

Any proceeding pursuant to this section shall conform to the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The director is not, however, required to allege facts necessary to show or which tend to show lack of adequate remedy at law or which show or tend to show irreparable damage or loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43003.

(a) In lieu of civil prosecution, the secretary or the commissioner may levy a civil penalty against any person violating this division or any regulation adopted pursuant to its provisions. Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the civil penalty for each violation shall be, for a first violation, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500). For a second or subsequent violation, the fine shall be not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) The secretary or the commissioner may, for a first violation, levy a civil penalty not to exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) for each violation of Section 42945, 42948, 42949, 42951, subdivision (b) of Section 44971,
 Section 44972, subdivision (c) of Section 44974, or Section 44986.

(c) The secretary or the commissioner may, for a first violation, levy a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for each violation of Section 44973, 44982, 44983, 44984, 45031, 45034, or 45035. For a second or subsequent violation, or for a violation involving avocados worth five hundred dollars ($500) or more, the fine shall be not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(d) Before a civil penalty is levied, the person charged with the violation shall receive notice of the nature of the violation and shall be given an opportunity to be heard. This shall include the right to review the evidence and a right to present evidence on his or her own behalf.

(e) The person fined may appeal to
 the secretary within 10 days of the date of receiving notification of the fine. The following procedures apply to the appeal:

(1) The appeal need not be formal, but it shall be in writing and signed by the appellant or his or her authorized agent, and shall state the grounds for the appeal.

(2) Any party may, at the time of filing the appeal or within 10 days thereafter, present written evidence and a written argument to the secretary.

(3) The secretary may grant oral arguments upon application made at the time written arguments are filed.

(4) If an application to present an oral argument is granted, written notice of the time and place for the oral argument shall be given at least 10 days before the date set for the oral argument. The times may be
 altered by mutual agreement.

(5) The secretary shall decide the appeal on any oral or written argument, brief, and evidence that he or she has received.

(6) The secretary shall render a written decision within 45 days of the date of appeal or within 15 days of the date of oral arguments.

(7) On an appeal pursuant to this section, the secretary may sustain, modify by reducing the amount of the fine, or reverse the decision of the commissioner. A copy of the secretary’s decision shall be delivered or mailed to the appellant and the commissioner.

(8) Review of the decision of the secretary may be sought by the appellant pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) After the
 exhaustion of the appeal and review procedures provided in this section, the commissioner, or his or her representative, may file a certified copy of a final decision of the commissioner that directs the payment of a civil penalty and, if applicable, a copy of any decision of the secretary, or his or her representative, rendered on an appeal from the commissioner’s decision, and a copy of any order that denies a petition for a writ of administrative mandamus, with the clerk of the superior court of any county. Judgment shall be entered immediately by the clerk in conformity with the decision or order. Pursuant to Section 6103 of the Government Code, the clerk of the superior court shall not charge a fee for the performance of any official service required in connection with the entry of judgment pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 61.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

43004.

Any action for any civil penalty or other civil remedy which is provided for under this division shall be commenced within three years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Abatement [43031. - 43041.]

43031.

Any lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables, including its containers, which is not in compliance in all respects with this division and the regulations which are issued pursuant to it, is a public nuisance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43032.

Any enforcing officer, if he has reason to believe that any lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables is not in compliance with this division or such regulations, may hold such lot pending proceedings to condemn and abate such nuisance, as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43033.

The officer may affix to any lot so held a tag or notice which warns that the lot is held and states the reason why it is held. It is unlawful for any person except an authorized enforcing officer to detach, alter, deface, or destroy any such tag or notice which is affixed to any such lot, or to remove or dispose of such lot in any manner or under conditions other than as prescribed in such tag or notice, except upon written permission of an authorized enforcing officer or by the order of a court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43034.

The officer by whom any lot of fruits, nuts, or vegetables is held shall cause notice of noncompliance to be served upon the person in possession of the lot. The notice of noncompliance shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(a) Include a description of the lot.

(b) State the place where, and the reasons for which, the lot is held.

(c) Give notice that the lot is a public nuisance and subject to disposal as provided in this article, unless within a specified time it is reconditioned or the deficiency otherwise corrected so as to bring it into compliance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43035.

If the person served is not the sole owner of the lot, or does not have authority as agent for the owner to bring the lot into compliance, such person shall, in writing, notify the officer by whom such lot is held of the name and address of the owner and all other persons that are known to him to claim an interest in the lot. Any person that is served with such a notice of noncompliance is liable for any loss which is sustained by such owner or other person whose name and address he has knowingly concealed from such officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

43036.
